Mississippi, session 2026, HB1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-57-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-57-21.  Where there has been a bona fide effort to register a birth and the certificate thereof on file with the Office of Vital Records does not divulge all of the information required by * * *said the certificate, or such certificate contains an incorrect first name, middle name, or sex, then the State Registrar of Vital Records may, in his discretion, correct such certificate upon affidavit of at least two (2) reputable persons having personal knowledge of the facts in relation thereto. All other alterations shall be made as provided in Section 41-57-23.  Anyone giving false information in such affidavit shall be subject to the penalties of perjury.  The State Registrar of Vital Records shall not be authorized to change the sex on a birth certificate unless it is clearly an error that is verified by medical records from the time of birth or by a physician who confirms that at the time of birth, the sex of the child was not what is shown on the birth certificate. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.